Illinois, session 104th, HB4053.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much of 5those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated from the 6General Revenue Fund to the Court of Claims to pay claims in 7conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 8of Claims as follows: 9No. 14-CC-0389, Erica Lopez-Linton, Individually and as 10Independent Administrator of the Estate of Nicholas Linton, 11deceased, Lyric Linton and Lillian Linton, personal injury 12against the Illinois State Police...............$2,535,459.50 13No. 14-CC-3980, BMDD Resorts Corporation, tort against the 14Department of Natural Resources....................$65,000.00 15No. 16-CC-2058, Planned Parenthood of Illinois, debt against 16the Illinois Department of Public Health..........$525,373.69 17No. 16-CC-2686, Michael Hill, personal injury against the 18Department of Corrections.........................$270,875.07 19No. 16-CC-3379, Wendy Wasilewski, personal injury against the   HB4053- 2 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Department of Human Services......................$100,000.00 2No. 20-CC-2272, Justin Moreno, personal injury against the 3Department of Transportation.......................$87,500.00 4No. 21-CC-1182, Teri Shepherd, as administrator of the Estate 5of Scott Hyman, deceased, personal injury against the 6Department of Human Services......................$250,000.00 7No. 21-CC-1507, Shannon Kostka, personal injury against the 8Department of Agriculture..........................$57,000.00 9No. 22-CC-2198, City of Crest Hill, debt against the 10Department of Corrections.........................$814,701.62 11No. 23-CC-1467, Inclime, Inc., debt against the Illinois Power 12Agency.............................................$87,281.01 13No. 23-CC-3424, Lutheran Child and Family Services of 14Illinois, debt against the Department of Children and Family 15Services..........................................$592,670.99 16No. 24-CC-2889, SHI International Corp., debt against the 17Department of Children and Family Services........$505,000.00 18No. 25-CC-0363, Ascension Resurrection Medical Center, debt   HB4053- 3 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1against the Department of Human Services..........$411,660.54 2No. 25-CC-0707, Government Property Fund, LLC, debt against 3the Department of Corrections.....................$494,158.38 4No. 25-CC-1528, Wexford Health Sources, Inc., debt against the 5Department of Corrections.......................$6,710,717.92 6No. 25-CC-1530, Wexford Health Sources, Inc., debt against the 7Department of Corrections.......................$2,197,864.44 8No. 25-CC-2076, Metropolitan Family Services, debt against the 9Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority.$1,494,029.21 10No. 25-CC-2573, Presence St. Joseph Hospital, debt against the 11Department of Human Services......................$166,973.22 12No. 25-CC-3498, Garda World Federal Services, LLC, debt 13against the Department of Human Services........$1,300,000.00 14    Section 2. The following named amounts, or so much of 15those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 16Court of Claims from the Education Assistance Fund to pay 17claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 18the Court of Claims as follows:   HB4053- 4 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 2awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$33,442.50 3    Section 3. The following named amounts, or so much of 4those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 5Court of Claims from the Road Fund to pay claims in conformity 6with awards and recommendations made by the Court of Claims as 7follows: 8No. 25-CC-0866, Motorola Solutions, Inc., debt against the 9Department of Transportation.......................$37,811.25 10No. 25-CC-0867, Motorola Solutions, Inc., debt against the 11Department of Transportation.......................$36,311.25 12No. 25-CC-0874, Motorola Solutions, Inc., debt against the 13Department of Transportation.......................$74,250.00 14    Section 4. The following named amounts, or so much of 15those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 16Court of Claims from the Motor Fuel Tax Fund to pay claims in 17conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 18of Claims as follows: 19Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 20awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$404.69   HB4053- 5 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much of 2those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 3Court of Claims from the Teacher Certificate Fee Revolving 4Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 5recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 6Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 7awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.........................$77.29 8    Section 6. The following named amounts, or so much of 9those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 10Court of Claims from the Drivers Education Fund to pay claims 11in conformity with awards and recommendations made by the 12Court of Claims as follows: 13Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 14awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.........................$96.90 15    Section 7. The following named amounts, or so much of 16those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 17Court of Claims from the State Parks Fund to pay claims in 18conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 19of Claims as follows: 20Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of   HB4053- 6 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$3,283.69 2    Section 8. The following named amounts, or so much of 3those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 4Court of Claims from the Wildlife and Fish Fund to pay claims 5in conformity with awards and recommendations made by the 6Court of Claims as follows: 7Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 8awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$144.94 9    Section 9. The following named amounts, or so much of 10those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 11Court of Claims from the Agricultural Premium Fund to pay 12claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 13the Court of Claims as follows: 14Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 15awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$42,677.21 16    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much of 17those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 18Court of Claims from the Fire Prevention Fund to pay claims in 19conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 20of Claims as follows:   HB4053- 7 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1No. 25-CC-2493, the Board of Trustees of the University of 2Illinois, debt against the Office of the State Fire 3Marshall..........................................$207,640.59 4Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 5awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$2,001.37 6    Section 11. The following named amounts, or so much of 7those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 8Court of Claims from the Title III Social Security and 9Employment Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 10recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 11No. 24-CC-3661, I.G. True Grit Holdings, Inc., tort against 12the Department of Employment Security..............$60,884.59 13No. 24-CC-3663, I.G. True Grit Holdings, Inc., tort against 14the Department of Employment Security..............$84,610.51 15Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 16awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$50,630.63 17    Section 12. The following named amounts, or so much of 18those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 19Court of Claims from the State Pensions Fund to pay claims in 20conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court   HB4053- 8 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1of Claims as follows: 2Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 3awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$10,148.09 4    Section 13. The following named amounts, or so much of 5those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 6Court of Claims from the Public Utility Fund to pay claims in 7conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 8of Claims as follows: 9Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 10awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$34,213.92 11    Section 14. The following named amounts, or so much of 12those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 13Court of Claims from the Alzheimer's Disease Research, Care, 14and Support Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 15recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 16Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 17awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$24,447.42 18    Section 15. The following named amounts, or so much of 19those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 20Court of Claims from the Public Health Services Fund to pay   HB4053- 9 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 2the Court of Claims as follows: 3No. 23-CC-1336, Pointcore, Inc., debt against the Illinois 4Department of Public Health.......................$127,012.35 5Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 6awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357....................$103,724.51 7    Section 16. The following named amounts, or so much of 8those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 9Court of Claims from the Underground Storage Tank Fund to pay 10claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 11the Court of Claims as follows: 12Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 13awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$2,137.00 14    Section 17. The following named amounts, or so much of 15those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 16Court of Claims from the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 17Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 18recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 19Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 20awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$1,798.90   HB4053- 10 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1    Section 18. The following named amounts, or so much of 2those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 3Court of Claims from the Illinois State Medical Disciplinary 4Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 5recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 6Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 7awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$826.40 8    Section 19. The following named amounts, or so much of 9those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 10Court of Claims from the State Treasurer's Administrative Fund 11to pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations 12made by the Court of Claims as follows: 13Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 14awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$185.00 15    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much of 16those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 17Court of Claims from the Facility Licensing Fund to pay claims 18in conformity with awards and recommendations made by the 19Court of Claims as follows: 20Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of   HB4053- 11 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$115.92 2    Section 21. The following named amounts, or so much of 3those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 4Court of Claims from the State Gaming Fund to pay claims in 5conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 6of Claims as follows: 7Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 8awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$8,151.70 9    Section 22. The following named amounts, or so much of 10those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 11Court of Claims from the Capital Development Fund to pay 12claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 13the Court of Claims as follows: 14Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 15awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$11,836.90 16    Section 23. The following named amounts, or so much of 17those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 18Court of Claims from the State Board of Education Special 19Purpose Trust Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 20recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows:   HB4053- 12 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1No. 24-CC-3621, Wested, debt against the State Board of 2Education.........................................$122,652.00 3Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 4awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$193.80 5    Section 24. The following named amounts, or so much of 6those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 7Court of Claims from the State Crime Laboratory Fund to pay 8claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 9the Court of Claims as follows: 10Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 11awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$19,563.00 12    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much of 13those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 14Court of Claims from the Weights and Measures Fund to pay 15claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 16the Court of Claims as follows: 17Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 18awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$1,282.44 19    Section 26. The following named amounts, or so much of 20those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the   HB4053- 13 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Court of Claims from the Capital Development Board Revolving 2Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 3recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 4Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 5awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$7,919.90 6    Section 27. The following named amounts, or so much of 7those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 8Court of Claims from the Professions Indirect Cost Fund to pay 9claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 10the Court of Claims as follows: 11No. 25-CC-1370, Tyler Technologies, Inc., debt against the 12Department of Financial and Professional Regulation.$293,453.75 13Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 14awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$1,911.61 15    Section 28. The following named amounts, or so much of 16those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 17Court of Claims from the DCFS Children's Services Fund to pay 18claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 19the Court of Claims as follows: 20No. 24-CC-3720, Maximum US Services, Inc., debt against the   HB4053- 14 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Department of Children and Family Services........$307,724.24 2No. 25-CC-1616, Lutheran Social Services of Illinois, debt 3against the Department of Children and Family 4Services..........................................$161,012.08 5    Section 29. The following named amounts, or so much of 6those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 7Court of Claims from the Illinois Health Facilities Planning 8Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 9recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 10Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 11awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.........................$39.40 12    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much of 13those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 14Court of Claims from the Credit Union Fund to pay claims in 15conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 16of Claims as follows: 17Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 18awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$121.98 19    Section 31. The following named amounts, or so much of 20those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the   HB4053- 15 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Court of Claims from the State Police Vehicle Fund to pay 2claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 3the Court of Claims as follows: 4Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 5awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$2,426.81 6    Section 32. The following named amounts, or so much of 7those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 8Court of Claims from the Illinois Secure Choice Administrative 9Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 10recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 11Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 12awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.........................$60.33 13    Section 33. The following named amounts, or so much of 14those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 15Court of Claims from the Nursing Dedicated and Professional 16Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 17recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 18Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 19awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$30,181.00 20    Section 34. The following named amounts, or so much of   HB4053- 16 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 2Court of Claims from the Mandatory Arbitration Fund to pay 3claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 4the Court of Claims as follows: 5Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 6awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$2,082.96 7    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much of 8those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 9Court of Claims from the LaSalle Veterans Home Fund to pay 10claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 11the Court of Claims as follows: 12Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 13awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$1,136.85 14    Section 36. The following named amounts, or so much of 15those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 16Court of Claims from the Long Term Care Monitor/Receiver Fund 17to pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations 18made by the Court of Claims as follows: 19Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 20awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$25,168.80   HB4053- 17 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1    Section 37. The following named amounts, or so much of 2those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 3Court of Claims from the Guardianship and Advocacy Fund to pay 4claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 5the Court of Claims as follows: 6Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 7awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$1,329.87 8    Section 38. The following named amounts, or so much of 9those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 10Court of Claims from the Professional Services Fund to pay 11claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 12the Court of Claims as follows: 13Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 14awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$87,100.81 15    Section 39. The following named amounts, or so much of 16those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 17Court of Claims from the Federal Support Agreement Revolving 18Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 19recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 20Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 21awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$752.05   HB4053- 18 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1    Section 40. The following named amounts, or so much of 2those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 3Court of Claims from the Criminal Justice Information Projects 4Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 5recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 6No. 25-CC-1838, DuSable Black History Museum and Education 7Center, debt against the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 8Authority.........................................$171,613.00 9No. 25-CC-2956, United Way of Greater St. Louis, debt against 10the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority.$476,906.62 11Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 12awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$15,261.42 13    Section 41. The following named amounts, or so much of 14those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 15Court of Claims from the Public Health Laboratory Services 16Revolving Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 17recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 18Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 19awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$6,992.37   HB4053- 19 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1    Section 42. The following named amounts, or so much of 2those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 3Court of Claims from the Audit Expense Fund to pay claims in 4conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 5of Claims as follows: 6Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 7awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$316.65 8    Section 43. The following named amounts, or so much of 9those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 10Court of Claims from the Lead Poisoning Screening, Prevention, 11and Abatement Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 12recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 13Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 14awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$4,585.97 15    Section 44. The following named amounts, or so much of 16those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 17Court of Claims from the Securities Audit and Enforcement Fund 18to pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations 19made by the Court of Claims as follows: 20Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 21awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$405.50   HB4053- 20 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much of 2those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 3Court of Claims from the Tanning Facility Permit Fund to pay 4claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 5the Court of Claims as follows: 6Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 7awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$600.00 8    Section 46. The following named amounts, or so much of 9those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 10Court of Claims from the Tax Compliance and Administration 11Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 12recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 13Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 14awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$28,959.57 15    Section 47. The following named amounts, or so much of 16those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 17Court of Claims from the EMS Assistance Fund to pay claims in 18conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 19of Claims as follows: 20No. 23-CC-3475, GL Suite, Inc., debt against the Department of   HB4053- 21 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Public Health......................................$70,007.57 2    Section 48. The following named amounts, or so much of 3those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 4Court of Claims from the Public Aid Recoveries Trust Fund to 5pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made 6by the Court of Claims as follows: 7No. 21-CC-2228, Krehbiel and Associates, debt against the 8Department of Healthcare and Family Services.......$65,219.00 9Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 10awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$50,788.54 11    Section 49. The following named amounts, or so much of 12those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 13Court of Claims from the Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund 14to pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations 15made by the Court of Claims as follows: 16Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 17awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$7,094.13 18    Section 50. The following named amounts, or so much of 19those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 20Court of Claims from the Coal to Solar and Energy Storage   HB4053- 22 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Initiative Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 2recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 3Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 4awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$14,829.10 5    Section 51. The following named amounts, or so much of 6those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 7Court of Claims from the Illinois State Fair Fund to pay claims 8in conformity with awards and recommendations made by the 9Court of Claims as follows: 10No. 24-CC-3286, Constellation Energy, debt against the 11Department of Agriculture.........................$284,929.95 12    Section 52. The following named amounts, or so much of 13those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 14Court of Claims from the State Library Fund to pay claims in 15conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 16of Claims as follows: 17Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 18awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$2,827.17 19    Section 53. The following named amounts, or so much of 20those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the   HB4053- 23 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Court of Claims from the Wholesome Meat Fund to pay claims in 2conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 3of Claims as follows: 4Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 5awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$14,693.71 6    Section 54. The following named amounts, or so much of 7those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 8Court of Claims from the State Employees Retirement Systems 9Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 10recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 11Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 12awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$1,162.25 13    Section 55. The following named amounts, or so much of 14those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 15Court of Claims from the Secretary of State Special Services 16Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 17recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 18Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 19awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$10,320.08 20    Section 56. The following named amounts, or so much of   HB4053- 24 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 2Court of Claims from the Criminal Justice Trust Fund to pay 3claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 4the Court of Claims as follows: 5No. 25-CC-2764, City of Rockford, debt against the Illinois 6Criminal Justice Information Authority.............$76,236.73 7No. 25-CC-3043, Community College District No. 508, Board of 8Trustees, debt against the Illinois Criminal Justice 9Information Authority.............................$127,322.29 10No. 25-CC-3218, Winnebago County CASA, debt against the 11Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority....$60,034.00 12Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 13awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$34,944.98 14    Section 57. The following named amounts, or so much of 15those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 16Court of Claims from the Department of Corrections 17Reimbursement and Education Fund to pay claims in conformity 18with awards and recommendations made by the Court of Claims as 19follows: 20Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of   HB4053- 25 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$20,118.85 2    Section 58. The following named amounts, or so much of 3those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 4Court of Claims from the Health Facility Plan Review Fund to 5pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made 6by the Court of Claims as follows: 7Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 8awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$733.48 9    Section 59. The following named amounts, or so much of 10those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 11Court of Claims from the Illinois Workers' Compensation 12Commission Operations Fund to pay claims in conformity with 13awards and recommendations made by the Court of Claims as 14follows: 15Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 16awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$24,788.55 17    Section 60. The following named amounts, or so much of 18those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 19Court of Claims from the Offender Registration Fund to pay 20claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 21the Court of Claims as follows:   HB4053- 26 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 2awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$17,800.00 3    Section 61. The following named amounts, or so much of 4those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 5Court of Claims from the Comptroller's Administrative Fund to 6pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made 7by the Court of Claims as follows: 8Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 9awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$2,016.75 10    Section 62. The following named amounts, or so much of 11those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 12Court of Claims from the SBE Federal Department of Education 13Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 14recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 15No. 25-CC-0976, the Southern Illinois University Board of 16Trustees, debt against the State Board of Education.$178,931.30 17No. 25-CC-2182, American Institute for Research, debt against 18the State Board of Education.......................$58,155.64 19Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of   HB4053- 27 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$21,651.06 2    Section 63. The following named amounts, or so much of 3those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 4Court of Claims from the Fire Prevention Division Fund to pay 5claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 6the Court of Claims as follows: 7Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 8awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$24,524.30 9    Section 64. The following named amounts, or so much of 10those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 11Court of Claims from the Statewide 9-1-1 Fund to pay claims in 12conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 13of Claims as follows: 14Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 15awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$18,985.00 16    Section 65. The following named amounts, or so much of 17those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 18Court of Claims from the Services for Older Americans Fund to 19pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made 20by the Court of Claims as follows:   HB4053- 28 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 2awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$8,700.17 3    Section 66. The following named amounts, or so much of 4those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 5Court of Claims from the Quincy Veterans Home Fund to pay 6claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 7the Court of Claims as follows: 8Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 9awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$41,137.41 10    Section 67. The following named amounts, or so much of 11those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 12Court of Claims from the Motor Vehicle License Plate Fund to 13pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made 14by the Court of Claims as follows: 15Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 16awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$17,135.34 17    Section 68. The following named amounts, or so much of 18those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 19Court of Claims from the Death Certificate Surcharge Fund to 20pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made 21by the Court of Claims as follows:   HB4053- 29 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 2awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$13,287.00 3    Section 69. The following named amounts, or so much of 4those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 5Court of Claims from the Commitment to Human Services Fund to 6pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made 7by the Court of Claims as follows: 8No. 23-CC-2292, Central Illinois Agency on Aging, debt against 9the Department on Aging............................$62,428.00 10Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 11awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$9,792.00 12    Section 70. The following named amounts, or so much of 13those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 14Court of Claims from the Downstate Public Transportation Fund 15to pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations 16made by the Court of Claims as follows: 17Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 18awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$33,710.00 19    Section 71. The following named amounts, or so much of   HB4053- 30 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 2Court of Claims from the Budget Stabilization Fund to pay 3claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 4the Court of Claims as follows: 5Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 6awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$678.92 7    Section 72. The following named amounts, or so much of 8those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 9Court of Claims from the ICCB Adult Education Fund to pay 10claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 11the Court of Claims as follows: 12No. 25-CC-1783, Heartland Community College, debt against the 13Illinois Community College Board...................$60,859.57 14    Section 73. The following named amounts, or so much of 15those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 16Court of Claims from the Long Term Care Ombudsman Fund to pay 17claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 18the Court of Claims as follows: 19No. 23-CC-2292, Central Illinois Agency on Aging, debt against 20the Department on Aging............................$33,058.88   HB4053- 31 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1    Section 74. The following named amounts, or so much of 2those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 3Court of Claims from the Assisted Living and Shared Housing 4Regulatory Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 5recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 6Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 7awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$1,838.59 8    Section 75. The following named amounts, or so much of 9those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 10Court of Claims from the State Lottery Fund to pay claims in 11conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 12of Claims as follows: 13Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 14awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$16,160.10 15    Section 76. The following named amounts, or so much of 16those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 17Court of Claims from the Medical Interagency Program Fund to 18pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made 19by the Court of Claims as follows: 20Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 21awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$31,970.25   HB4053- 32 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1    Section 77. The following named amounts, or so much of 2those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 3Court of Claims from the National Guard and Naval Militia 4Grant Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 5recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 6Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 7awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$401.40 8    Section 78. The following named amounts, or so much of 9those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 10Court of Claims from the Comptroller Debt Recovery Trust Fund 11to pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations 12made by the Court of Claims as follows: 13Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 14awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$1,130.02 15    Section 79. The following named amounts, or so much of 16those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 17Court of Claims from the Secretary of State DUI Administration 18Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 19recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 20Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of   HB4053- 33 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$4,195.75 2    Section 80. The following named amounts, or so much of 3those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 4Court of Claims from the Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund to 5pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made 6by the Court of Claims as follows: 7Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 8awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$1,637.37 9    Section 81. The following named amounts, or so much of 10those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 11Court of Claims from the Law Enforcement Training Fund to pay 12claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 13the Court of Claims as follows: 14Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 15awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$39,370.00 16    Section 82. The following named amounts, or so much of 17those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 18Court of Claims from the State's Attorneys Appellate 19Prosecutor's County Fund to pay claims in conformity with 20awards and recommendations made by the Court of Claims as 21follows:   HB4053- 34 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 2awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$335.91 3    Section 83. The following named amounts, or so much of 4those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 5Court of Claims from the Child Support Administrative Fund to 6pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made 7by the Court of Claims as follows: 8Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 9awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$21,994.65 10    Section 84. The following named amounts, or so much of 11those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 12Court of Claims from the Secretary of State Police Services 13Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 14recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 15Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 16awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$2,955.03 17    Section 85. The following named amounts, or so much of 18those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 19Court of Claims from the Tourism Promotion Fund to pay claims 20in conformity with awards and recommendations made by the   HB4053- 35 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Court of Claims as follows: 2Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 3awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$75,415.61 4    Section 86. The following named amounts, or so much of 5those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 6Court of Claims from the Presidential Library and Museum 7Operating Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 8recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 9Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 10awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$44,857.63 11    Section 87. The following named amounts, or so much of 12those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 13Court of Claims from the Healthcare Provider Relief Fund to 14pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made 15by the Court of Claims as follows: 16No. 24-CC-0101, Advocate Health and Hospitals Corporation, 17debt against the Department of Healthcare and Family 18Services........................................$1,320,000.00 19No. 24-CC-3008, Deloitte Consulting, LLP, debt against the 20Department of Healthcare and Family Services......$607,612.50   HB4053- 36 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 2awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$44,776.93 3    Section 88. The following named amounts, or so much of 4those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 5Court of Claims from the Bank and Trust Company Fund to pay 6claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 7the Court of Claims as follows: 8Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 9awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$657.87 10    Section 89. The following named amounts, or so much of 11those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 12Court of Claims from the Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness 13Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 14recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 15Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 16awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$180.80 17    Section 90. The following named amounts, or so much of 18those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 19Court of Claims from the Department of Human Rights Special 20Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and   HB4053- 37 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 2Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 3awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$5,491.54 4    Section 91. The following named amounts, or so much of 5those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 6Court of Claims from the Attorney General's State Projects and 7Court Ordered Distribution Fund to pay claims in conformity 8with awards and recommendations made by the Court of Claims as 9follows: 10No. 24-CC-3898, Advocate Health and Hospitals Corporation, 11debt against the Office of the Attorney General....$90,000.00 12Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 13awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$91,521.31 14    Section 92. The following named amounts, or so much of 15those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 16Court of Claims from the Personal Property Tax Replacement 17Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 18recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 19Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 20awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$2,561.01   HB4053- 38 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1    Section 93. The following named amounts, or so much of 2those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 3Court of Claims from the State Police Operations Assistance 4Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 5recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 6No. 25-CC-1694, Streicher's, Inc., debt against the Illinois 7State Police.......................................$58,700.00 8Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 9awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$1,811.42 10    Section 94. The following named amounts, or so much of 11those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 12Court of Claims from the Dram Shop Fund to pay claims in 13conformity with awards and recommendations made by the Court 14of Claims as follows: 15Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 16awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$674.45 17    Section 95. The following named amounts, or so much of 18those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 19Court of Claims from the Real Estate License Administration 20Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and   HB4053- 39 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 2Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 3awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$195.00 4    Section 96. The following named amounts, or so much of 5those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 6Court of Claims from the Community Services Block Grant Fund 7to pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations 8made by the Court of Claims as follows: 9Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 10awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$13,729.32 11    Section 97. The following named amounts, or so much of 12those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 13Court of Claims from the Maternal and Child Health Services 14Block Grant Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 15recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 16No. 23-CC-0796, Jemm Technologies, debt against the Illinois 17Department of Public Health........................$54,599.96 18Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 19awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$3,356.19   HB4053- 40 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1    Section 98. The following named amounts, or so much of 2those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 3Court of Claims from the Public Health Special State Projects 4Funds to pay claims in conformity with awards and 5recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 6No. 23-CC-0799, Illinois Office of the Auditor General, debt 7against the Illinois Department of Public Health..$120,402.00 8No. 23-CC-3309, Integrated Solutions Consulting Corporation, 9debt against the Illinois Department of Public 10Health.............................................$75,000.00 11Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 12awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357....................$152,552.87 13    Section 99. The following named amounts, or so much of 14those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 15Court of Claims from the Cannabis Regulation Fund to pay 16claims in conformity with awards and recommendations made by 17the Court of Claims as follows: 18Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 19awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357......................$6,298.99 20    Section 100. The following named amounts, or so much of   HB4053- 41 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 2Court of Claims from the Metabolic Screening and Treatment 3Fund to pay claims in conformity with awards and 4recommendations made by the Court of Claims as follows: 5Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 6awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357........................$345.00 7    Section 101. The following named amounts, or so much of 8those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 9Court of Claims from the Build Illinois Bond Fund to pay claims 10in conformity with awards and recommendations made by the 11Court of Claims as follows: 12No. 24-CC-3391, Rebuild Foundation NFP, debt against the 13Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity....$50,000.00 14No. 25-CC-0171, Mediacom, LLC, debt against the Department of 15Commerce and Economic Opportunity.................$210,805.51 16No. 25-CC-0172, Mediacom, LLC, debt against the Department of 17Commerce and Economic Opportunity.................$220,348.50 18Reimbursement of the General Revenue Fund for payment of 19awards pursuant to P.A. 92-357.....................$17,357.50   HB4053- 42 -LRB104 13544 JRC 26031 b1    Section 102. The following named amounts, or so much of 2those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 3Court of Claims from the BHE Federal Grants Fund to pay claims 4in conformity with awards and recommendations made by the 5Court of Claims as follows: 6No. 25-CC-0667, Greenville University, debt against the Board 7of Higher Education................................$55,427.21 8    Section 103. The following named amounts, or so much of 9those amounts as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 10Court of Claims from the Insurance Financial Regulation Fund 11to pay claims in conformity with awards and recommendations 12made by the Court of Claims as follows: 13No. 23-CC-4518, INS Regulatory Insurance Services, debt 14against the Department of Insurance...............$104,928.75 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 162025.